src/udm-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols

! POS
+N +V +A 
+Adv +CC +CS +Interj +ProN +Num

! Vербал MSP
+Prs +Fut +Prt +Prf +PrfIpf +HstPrf +PluPrf +HstPluPrf
+Ind +Imp +Cond +Opt
+Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
+Inf
+Pos +Neg

! Nоминал MSP
+Sg +Pl
+Nom +Acc +Gen +Abl +Dat +Abe +Adc +Ins +Apr +Ine +Ill +Ela +Egr
+Prl
+Ord
+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
+Qst

+Appr
+Advc
+Tra
+Ter
+Pro
+Car 

+Pers
+Dem

+PstI
+PstII

е2 о2 ӧ2 к2 м2 т2 %> ӝ ӟ ӵ щ 

! Kеы леъицон

LEXICON ROOT

NOUN ;
PROPERNOUN ;
VERB ;
ADJECTIVE ;
ADVERB ;
CONJUNCTION ;
SUBJUNCTION ;
INTERJECTION ;
NUMERAL ;
PRONOUN ;
POSTPOSITION ;
PUNCTUATION ;



! I INCLUDE SOME SMALL LEXICA HERE
! WAITING FOR OWN FILES, OR PERHAPS THEY COULD STAY HERE

LEXICON CONJUNCTION 
но CT ;
нош CT ;

LEXICON CT
+CS: # ;
 
LEXICON SUBJUNCTION  
# ;

LEXICON INTERJECTION 
# ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
одӥг NUMBERSUF ;
кык:кыкт2 NUMBERSUF ;
куинь:куиньт2 NUMBERSUF ;
ньыль NUMBERSUF ;
вить NUMBERSUF ;
куать NUMBERSUF ;
сизьым NUMBERSUF ;
тямыс NUMBERSUF ;
ыкмыс NUMBERSUF ;
дас NUMBERSUF ;
кызь NUMBERSUF ;
куамын NUMBERSUF ;
ньыльдон NUMBERSUF ;
витьтон NUMBERSUF ;
куатьтон NUMBERSUF ;
сизьымдон NUMBERSUF ;
тямыстон NUMBERSUF ;
ыкмыстон NUMBERSUF ;
сю NUMBERSUF ;
сюрс NUMBERSUF ;
миллион NUMBERSUF ;
миллиард NUMBERSUF ;

LEXICON NUMBERSUF
+Num: K;
+Num:%> CASESUF ;
+Num:%> ORDINAL ;

LEXICON ORDINAL
+Ord:этӥ K;



LEXICON K
+Qst:а #;
#; 
